Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-188
Energy audit report.

A report of the findings of any energy audit
conducted under the Deferred Building Renewal Act shall be sent electronically
to the state agency operating or managing the state-owned building, utility,
or ground on which the audit was conducted and the Committee on Building Maintenance
of the Legislature.

Laws 2011, LB228, § 3.